Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2921.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; OROMO YOUTH PROGRAMS.new text end new text begin $200,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to HIRPHA International for youth programs in the metropolitan area, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, that celebrate Oromo cultural heritage and arts. new text end